Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1013
Sanitary facilities required; camping or open fires prohibited.

If the right-of-way or any portion thereof is used as a state recreational trail pursuant to sections 37-912 and 37-1011, appropriate sanitary facilities shall be provided along the trail for the use of persons using the trail. Camping or open fires shall be prohibited on such right-of-way or portion thereof.

Laws 1993, LB 739, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.62;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 388;

Laws 2000, LB 701, § 4.